Washington statutes.
RCW 33.43.030

Conversion of federal association to domestic association.

Any federal savings and loan association the home office of which is located in this state may convert itself into a domestic savings and loan association of this state. For any such conversion, such federal association shall proceed as provided in this title for the conversion of a domestic association into a federal association.

Upon consummation of such conversion, the successor domestic association shall succeed to all right, title, and interest of the federal association in and to its assets, and to its liabilities to the creditors and members of such federal association.

[ 1945 c 235 s 118; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-237. Prior: 1939 c 98 s 1. Formerly RCW 33.44.120.]